Alaska, session 34, HB198.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 16.05.790(c) is amended to read: 05 (c) It is an affirmative defense in [IN] a prosecution under this section 06 (1) [, IT IS AN AFFIRMATIVE DEFENSE] that the person was 07 lawfully entitled to obstruct or hinder the hunting, fishing, trapping, or viewing of fish 08 or game; or 09 (2) for disabling a trap or snare on public land that the person 10 (A) was lawfully using a public trail, park, campsite, or 11 other facility; and 12 (B) disabled the trap or snare based on the person's 13 objectively reasonable belief that disabling the trap or snare was 14 necessary to protect the welfare of the public or private property. 01 * Sec. 2. AS 16.05.791(b) is amended to read: 02 (b) Except as provided in (d) of this section, a [A] person aggrieved by a 03 violation of AS 16.05.790 is entitled to recover general damages and special damages, 04 including license and permit fees, travel costs, guide-outfitting fees, costs for special 05 equipment and supplies, and other related expenses. 06 * Sec. 3. AS 16.05.791(c) is amended to read: 07 (c) Except as provided in (d) of this section, a [A] court may award punitive 08 damages in addition to the damages set out in (b) of this section. 09 * Sec. 4. AS 16.05.791 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 10 (d) A person may not recover damages under this section from an individual 11 who committed a violation of AS 16.05.790 if the individual successfully raises an 12 affirmative defense to the violation under AS 16.05.790(c)(2). 13 * Sec. 5. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.